Louisiana, session 2026, HB1228.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2441(B), 2442(2), 2444, 2444.1, 2444.2(A) and (B)(2), 2445(3),
2447, and 2450(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2441. Registration and licensing required
* * *
B. The provisions of this Section are enacted to:
(1) Protect the public.
(2) Aid the Department of Revenue in collecting sales taxes on labor, on
retail prices of hearing aids, and on material used in the repair, service, and
maintenance of hearing aids.
(3)(2) Provide an adequate supply of licensed hearing aid dealers throughout
the state to serve as sponsors for applicants seeking temporary training permits
pursuant to R.S. 37:2449.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1228 ENROLLED
§2442. Definitions
The following words and phrases, when used in this Chapter, have the
following meanings:
* * *
(2) "Hearing aid" means any wearable instrument or device designed for or
represented as aiding or compensating for defective human hearing and any parts,
attachments, or accessories of such an instrument or device as defined by the United
States Food and Drug Administration.
* * *
§2444. Bill of sale; contract
Any person who engages in the fitting or selling of hearing aids shall deliver
to each person supplied with a hearing aid, by him or at his order or direction, a bill
of sale or contract which shall contain his signature and show the address of his
regular place of business with a contact phone number, email address, and the
number of his license, together with a description of the make, model, and serial
number of the hearing aid furnished and the amount charged therefor. The bill of
sale or contract shall also reveal the condition of the hearing device and whether it
is new, used, or rebuilt, and the mailing address, email address, and phone number
of the Louisiana Board for Hearing Aid Dealers.
§2444.1. Testing period for hearing aids
A.(1) Any person licensed pursuant to this Chapter who sells a hearing aid
to a consumer shall provide a written receipt or written contract to the consumer.
The written receipt or contract shall provide the consumer with a thirty-day right to
cancel the purchase if the consumer finds that the hearing aid does not function
adequately for the consumer. If the consumer cancels the hearing aid purchase based
on this Subsection, the consumer may obtain a refund if he returns the hearing aid
to the seller in the same condition, ordinary wear and tear excluded, as when
purchased. The written receipt or contract shall notify the consumer of the thirty-day
right to cancel period in at least ten point type. The thirty-day right to cancel period
shall commence from either the date the hearing aid is originally delivered to the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1228 ENROLLED
consumer or the date the written receipt or contract is delivered to the consumer,
whichever is later. The thirty-day period shall be interrupted for any period during
which the hearing aid seller, dealer, or fitter has possession or control of the hearing
aid after its original delivery.
(2) The consumer may exercise the right to return the purchase by presenting
the hearing aid directly to the office in which it was sold or by returning the hearing
aid to the location listed on the written receipt or written contract via trackable
shipping methods within the time allotted with notice of his intent to return. The
seller shall accept the return and issue a return receipt. Upon cancellation the
consumer shall make available to the seller in substantially as good condition as
when received, any goods delivered under the contract or sale. Any property traded
in for credit, any payments made by the consumer under the contract or sale, and any
negotiable instrument executed shall be returned by the seller to the consumer within
ten business days following receipt by the seller of the cancellation notice and
hearing aid. The cancellation notice shall be delivered in writing, and may be
delivered by electronic mail, as verification of intent to return within thirty days.
The consumer is still responsible for the cancellation fee.
B. Upon exercise of the thirty-day right to cancel a hearing aid purchase, the
seller of the hearing aid is entitled to a cancellation fee not to exceed fifteen percent
of all fees charged to the consumer, including testing, fitting, counseling, and the
purchase price of the hearing aid before taxes. The exact amount of the cancellation
fee shall be stated in the written receipt or contract provided to the consumer.
§2444.2. Three-day cooling off period
A. A consumer may cancel any transaction for the purchase of a hearing aid,
without any penalty or obligation, within three business days of the date the hearing
aid is actually ordered by the consumer. The consumer shall notify the seller of his
intent to cancel by notifying the seller in person at the office where the transaction
for the purchase took place, or by electronic mail, or by mail postmarked within three
business days of the date the hearing aid is actually ordered by the consumer. Upon
such cancellation, any property traded in for credit, any payments made by the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1228 ENROLLED
consumer under the contract or sale, and any negotiable instrument executed
thereupon shall be returned by the seller to the consumer within ten business days
following receipt by the seller of the cancellation notice. Any security interest
arising out of the transaction shall be immediately canceled.
B.
* * *
(2) The notice of cancellation shall be is effective if it is delivered to the
seller within the time frame described in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection and shall
include a signed and dated copy of the subject contract, receipt, sales form, or other
document evidencing all the terms of the transaction and the consumer's written
notice to cancel.
§2445. New application fee; qualifications
A new applicant for a first-time license shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars
and shall show to the satisfaction of the board that he:
* * *
(3) Has an education equivalent to a four-year course in an accredited high
school and two years of college or two years of accredited higher education or has
continuously engaged in fitting and selling hearing aids during the two years
preceding the effective date of this Chapter and is in good standing for a period of
no less than two years from the date of application.
* * *
§2447. Scope of examination
The examination provided in R.S. 37:2446 shall consist of tests of knowledge
in the areas of hearing testing and other areas to determine capability of fitting and
selling hearing aids. The tests provided for in this Section shall not include questions
requiring a formal college, medical, surgical, or audiological education. The
examination shall be determined and proctored by the Louisiana Board for Hearing
Aid Dealers or its assignees.
* * *
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1228 ENROLLED
§2450. Place of business; notice by mail
A. A person who holds a license obtained by examination, certificate of
endorsement license, or temporary training permit shall notify the board in writing
of the address of the place or places where he engages or intends to engage in the
fitting or selling of hearing aids.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.